Washington statutes.
RCW 16.67.070

Vacancies—Compensation and travel expenses.

(1) In the event a position on the commission becomes vacant due to resignation, disqualification, death, or for any other reason, the unexpired term of such position shall be filled by the director forthwith.

(2) Each member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.230.

(3) Each member or employee shall be reimbursed for actual travel expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter as defined by the commission in rule. Otherwise if not defined in rule, reimbursement for travel expenses shall be at the rates allowed by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2002 c 313 s 81; 1991 c 9 s 4; 1984 c 287 s 19; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 22; 1969 c 133 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.